Indiana, session 2026, SB121.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-34-3-28.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 28.5. (a) The department, in
coordination with any agency or organization the department
deems appropriate, shall develop informational materials
concerning type 1 diabetes for the parents of students.
(b) The department shall make the informational materials
developed under subsection (a) available to public schools,
including charter schools, by publishing the informational
materials on the department's website.
(c) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the governing
body of a school corporation or the equivalent authority of a
charter school shall make the informational materials described in
subsection (a) available to a student's parent each year upon the
student's enrollment.
(d) The informational materials described in subsection (a) shall
include:
2026 IN 121—LS 6469/DI 152


(1) a description of:
(A) type 1 diabetes;
(B) risk factors and warning signs associated with type 1
diabetes; and
(C) the necessity for screening all students for early
detection of type 1 diabetes using a blood autoantibody
test; and
(2) a recommendation for a student displaying:
(A) warning signs; or
(B) early detection screening results;
associated with type 1 diabetes that the student's parent
should immediately consult with the student's doctor to
develop an appropriate treatment plan, which may include a
consultation with a specialty care provider such as a qualified
endocrinologist.
2026 IN 121—LS 6469/DI 152